Utah statutes.
59-1-1102.   Disclosure of tax information -- Confidentiality.
(1) (a)  Notwithstanding Section 59-1-403, the commission may disclose the tax
due, the name of the taxpayer, and the taxpayer's address and phone number
when any tax is referred to a private collector under Section 59-1-1101.
(b)  This disclosure may not be made if it would be in violation of Section
6103 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2)  Any private collector is subject to the confidentiality requirements and
penalty provisions provided in Section 59-1-403 with regard to these records.
